Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Chapter 29. Local and Regional Railroad Authorities

§ 19-29-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Railroad Authorities Law.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 19-29-3.
Legislative findings and declaration of purpose.

It is hereby declared by the Legislature of the State of Mississippi that railroad transportation and commerce is essential to the economic well-being of the state and the development of its natural resources and its agriculture and industry, and the preservation, development and maintenance of the state’s rail service is in the public interest and serves a public purpose. It is the intent of the Legislature by this chapter to provide the manner and means necessary to carry out such purposes. The exercise of the powers granted in this chapter to the authorities and other public bodies is hereby declared to be a public and governmental function for a public purpose and public necessity.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 19-29-5.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms shall have the meanings respectively ascribed to them in this section:

“Act” means the railroad authorities law.

“Authority” or “railroad authority” means any of the public bodies corporate and politic created pursuant to this chapter or any law amendatory or supplemental thereto.

“Bonds” means any bonds, notes, interim certificates, debentures or similar obligations issued by an authority pursuant to this chapter.

“Federal government” means the United States of America or any department, division, commission or agency and instrumentality thereof, including the department of transportation and the interstate commerce commission.

“Governing body” means the board of commissioners of the authority.

“Person” means individuals, corporations, partnerships or foreign domestic associations.

“Railroad” means a common carrier by railroad as defined in section 1(3) of Part I of the Interstate Commerce Act (49 U.S.C.S., Section 1(3)).

“Railroad properties and facilities” means any real or personal property or interest in such property which is owned, leased or otherwise controlled by a railroad or other person, including an authority, and which are used or are useful in rail transportation service, including:

Track, roadbed and related structures, including rail, ties, ballast, other track materials, grading, tunnels, bridges, tressels, culverts, elevated structures, stations, office buildings used for operating purposes only, repair shops, engine houses and public improvements used or usable for rail service operation;

Communication and power transmission systems for use by railroads;

Signals, including signals and interlockers;

Terminal or yard facilities and services to express company and railroads and their shippers, including ferries, tugs, car floats and related shoreside facilities designed for the transportation of equipment by water;

Shop or repair facilities or any other property used or capable of being used in rail freight transportation services or in connection with such services or for originating, terminating, improving and expediting the movement of equipment or goods.

“Rail service” means both freight and passenger railroad service.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 19-29-7.
Creation of county railroad authority; commissioners; public hearing; authorization for county or municipality to create or dissolve authority.

Any county in which there is located existing railroad properties and facilities or in which railroad properties and facilities previously existed, but were abandoned after February 5, 1976, may, by resolution, create a public body corporate and politic, to be known as a county railroad authority, which shall be authorized to exercise its functions upon the appointment and qualifications of the first commissioners thereof. Upon the adoption of a resolution creating a county railroad authority, the board of supervisors of the county shall, pursuant to the resolution, appoint five (5) persons as commissioners of the authority. The commissioners who are first appointed shall be designated to serve the terms of one (1), two (2), three (3), four (4) and five (5) years respectively. Thereafter, each commissioner shall be appointed for a term of five (5) years, except that vacancies occurring otherwise than by the expiration of term shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointments. A county shall not adopt a resolution authorized by this section without a public hearing thereon. Notice thereof shall be given at least ten (10) days prior thereto in a newspaper published in the county, or if there is no newspaper published therein, then in a newspaper having general circulation in the county.

Any county and a municipality within a county may create a railroad authority under this section by resolution adopted by the respective governing authorities. The authority shall be governed by five (5) commissioners. The board of supervisors shall appoint two (2) persons as commissioners of the authority. The governing authorities of the municipality shall appoint two (2) persons as commissioners of the authority. One (1) commissioner shall be appointed by the municipality and the county on a rotating basis with the municipality making the first appointment. The terms of the commissioners shall be the same as those provided in subsection (1) with the term designation to be determined by the majority vote of the governing authorities of the municipality and of the county. The municipality and the county may dissolve the authority by a majority vote of both governing authorities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 4; Laws, 1999, ch. 376, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 19-29-9.
Regional railroad authority; increase or decrease of participating counties; public hearing; commissioners; appointment of executive committee; associate members from outside authority’s jurisdiction.

Two (2) or more counties in which there are located railroad properties and facilities of a railroad, or in which such properties and facilities previously existed, but were abandoned after February 5, 1976, may, by resolution of each, create a public body, corporate and politic, to be known as a regional railroad authority which shall be authorized to exercise its functions upon the issuance by the Secretary of State of a certificate of incorporation. The board of supervisors of each county joining in such regional authority shall, pursuant to the resolution organizing such authority, appoint five (5) residents of the county as commissioners of the authority and, as soon thereafter as practicable, the governing authorities of any municipality in such county, through which such railroads run, shall appoint a commissioner of the authority.

If the regional authority consists of an even number of commissioners, an additional commissioner shall be appointed by the Governor from within the geographic boundaries of the regional authority.

A regional railroad authority may be increased from time to time to serve one or more additional counties if each additional county and each of the counties then included in the regional authority and the commissioners of the regional authority, respectively, adopt a resolution consenting thereto. If a county railroad authority for any county seeking to be included in the regional authority is then in existence, the commissioners of the county authority shall consent to the inclusion of the county in the regional authority, and if the county authority has any bonds outstanding, unless fifty-one percent (51%) or more of the holders of the bonds consent, in writing, to the inclusion of the county in the regional authority, no such inclusion shall be effected. Upon the inclusion of any county in the regional authority, all rights, contracts, obligations and property, real and personal, of the county authority shall be in the name of and vest in the regional authority.

A regional railroad authority may be decreased if each of the counties then included in the regional authority and the commissioners of the regional authority consent to the decrease and make provision for the retention or disposition of its assets and liabilities; however, if the regional authority has any bonds outstanding, no decrease shall be effected unless seventy-five percent (75%) or more of the holders of the bonds consent thereto in writing.

A county shall not adopt any resolution authorized by this section without a public hearing thereon. Notice thereof shall be given at least ten (10) days prior thereto in a newspaper published in the county, or if there is no newspaper published therein, then in a newspaper having general circulation in the county.

All commissioners of a regional railroad authority appointed by municipalities shall be appointed for terms of five (5) years each. Commissioners who are initially appointed by a board of supervisors shall be designated to serve terms of one (1), two (2), three (3), four (4) and five (5) years, respectively; thereafter, each such term shall be five (5) years. A vacancy occurring otherwise than by expiration of term shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointments.

A regional railroad authority, in its discretion, by resolution duly adopted and entered upon its minutes, may appoint an executive committee from among its membership. The executive committee shall consist of such number and shall be appointed in such manner so as to fairly represent the counties and municipalities served by the regional authority. The members of the executive committee shall serve for such terms as designated by the regional authority and may be removed from the committee before expiration of their terms in accordance with such procedure as the regional authority may adopt. The executive committee, when so appointed, may be authorized by the regional authority to exercise such powers and perform such duties, with or without the prior approval of the regional authority, as the regional authority deems appropriate; however, the executive committee may not exercise any power or perform any duty that is inconsistent with or in excess of the powers and duties authorized to be performed under the provisions of this chapter by the commissioners of the regional authority.

A regional railroad authority may accept counties, municipalities and other political subdivisions of the state outside the jurisdiction of the regional authority to become associate members.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 5; Laws, 2007, ch. 406, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 484, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 6, 2011.).

§ 19-29-11.
Submission of resolutions of regional authority to Secretary of State; certificate of incorporation.

Upon the appointment and qualification of the commissioners first appointed to a regional railroad authority, they shall submit to the Secretary of State a certified copy of each resolution adopted pursuant to subsection (1) of Section 19-29-9 by the counties included in the regional authority. Upon receipt thereof, the Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of incorporation to the regional railroad authority.

When a regional railroad authority is increased or decreased pursuant to subsections (2) and (3) of Section 19-29-9, it shall forward to the Secretary of State a certified copy of each resolution adopted pursuant thereto and, upon receipt thereof, the Secretary of State shall issue an amended certificate of incorporation in accordance therewith.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 19-29-13.
Proof of authorization or existence of county or regional railroad authority.

In any suit, action or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of, or relating to, any contract of a county railroad authority, created pursuant to Section 19-29-7, the county authority shall be conclusively deemed to have become established and authorized to transact its business and exercise its powers upon proof of the adoption by the county of the resolution creating the county railroad authority and of the appointment and qualification of the first commissioners thereof.

In any suit, action or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of, or relating to, any contract of a regional railroad authority, such regional railroad authority shall be conclusively deemed to have become established and authorized to transact its business and exercise its powers upon proof of the issuance by the Secretary of State of a certificate of incorporation of such regional railroad authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 7; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 106, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 19-29-15.
Commissioners; expenses; quorum; officers.

A commissioner of an authority shall receive no compensation for his services, but shall be entitled to the necessary expenses, including traveling expenses, incurred in the discharge of his duties. Each commissioner shall hold office until his successor has been appointed and has qualified. The certificates of the appointment and reappointment of commissioners shall be filed with the authority.

The powers of each authority shall be vested in the commissioners thereof. A majority of the commissioners of an authority shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting the business of the authority and exercising its powers and for all other purposes. Action may be taken by the authority upon a vote of not less than a majority of the commissioners present.

There shall be elected a chairman and vice chairman from among the commissioners.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 19-29-17.
General powers of railroad authority.

An authority shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter (excluding the power to levy and collect taxes or special assessments, unless otherwise specified in the chapter) including, but not limited to, the power:

To sue and be sued, to have a seal, and to have perpetual succession;

To make and from time to time amend and repeal bylaws, rules and regulations not inconsistent with this chapter, to carry into effect the powers and purposes of this authority;

To maintain a principal office, and if necessary, regional offices at locations within its boundaries;

To employ an executive director, secretary, technical experts, superintendents and other such officers, agents, employees, permanent or temporary, as may be required by or beneficial to the authority, and to determine their qualifications, duties and compensation; and to retain or contract with consulting engineers, financial consultants, accountants, attorneys and such other consultants and independent contractors as are necessary in its judgement to carry out the provisions of this chapter and to also fix the compensation thereof;

To engage in research and development with respect to railroads;

To plan, establish, acquire, construct, enlarge, reconstruct, improve, operate, maintain, replace, repair, extend, improve, regulate and protect railroad properties and facilities within its boundaries. For such purposes, an authority may acquire such properties or any interest therein by purchase, gift, lease, devise, eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, provided it shall not have the power to condemn property owned or used by a railroad unless the federal government has authorized the abandonment of the railroad line;

To make the use and services of the railroad properties and facilities available to others in the furtherance of the purposes of this chapter and upon such terms and conditions as the governing body of the authority shall deem proper. In so doing, the authority shall have the power to lease same to others upon such terms and conditions as the authority may determine unless specifically provided for herein;

To receive and accept contributions, grants or other financial assistance from the federal government, the state or any political subdivision thereof, including the county and others, to be used in the furtherance of the purposes of this chapter;

To purchase, rent, lease or otherwise acquire any and all kinds of property, both real and personal, whether or not subject to deeds of trust, mortgages, liens, charges or other encumbrances, for the authority, which, in the judgment of its governing bodies, is necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

To acquire property which is suitable for use by industries requiring access to any railroad track owned, operated or subsidized by the authority;

To establish schedules of tolls, fees, rates, charges and rentals for the use of the railroad properties and facilities and to charge, alter and collect such tolls, fees, rates, charges and rentals in carrying out the provisions of the chapter; and

To make contracts and execute instruments containing such covenants, terms and conditions as in the judgment of the governing body may be necessary, proper or advisable for the purpose of obtaining grants, loans or other financial assistance from any federal or state agency for or in the aid of the acquisition or improvement of the railroad properties and facilities herein provided; to make all other contracts and execute all other instruments including without limitation licenses, long and short term leases, mortgages and deeds of trust and other agreements relating to the railroad property and facilities within its boundaries, and the construction, operation, maintenance, repair and improvement thereof as in the judgment of the governing body may be necessary, proper or advisable for the furtherance of the purposes of this chapter and the full exercise of the powers herein granted; and to carry out and perform the covenants, terms and conditions of all such contracts or instruments.

In addition to the general and special powers conferred in this section or elsewhere in this chapter, the authority is authorized to exercise such powers as are necessarily incidental to the exercise of such general and special powers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 19-29-18.
Ad valorem tax for acquisition and maintenance of railroad properties.

The governing body of a county railroad authority or regional railroad authority, as the case may be, may file a petition with the board of supervisors of any county included in the railroad authority, specifying for each such county, the rate of the ad valorem tax, not to exceed two (2) mills, to be levied by such county on the taxable property therein, for acquisition and maintenance of railroad properties and facilities, and to defray operating expenses of the railroad authority and any other expenses authorized to be incurred by the railroad authority. Prior to levying the tax specified by the railroad authority, the board of supervisors of each such county shall publish notice of its intention to levy same. The notice shall be published once each week for three (3) weeks in some newspaper having a general circulation in the county, but not less than twenty-one (21) days, nor more than sixty (60) days, intervening between the time of the first notice and the meeting at which said board proposes to levy the tax. If, within the time of giving notice, twenty percent (20%) or one thousand five hundred (1,500) of the qualified electors of the county, whichever is less, shall file a written protest against the levy of the tax, then the tax shall not be levied unless authorized by three-fifths (3/5) of the qualified electors of such county, voting at an election to be called and held for that purpose. If the tax levy fails to be authorized at an election held in a county included in the regional authority, then such tax levy shall not be made in any of the counties included in such regional authority.

The avails of the ad valorem tax levied under authority of this section shall be paid by the county board of supervisors to the governing body of the railroad authority to be used as herein authorized.

For any fiscal year after the initial levy of the tax, the board of supervisors levying same shall levy such tax at a millage rate which will produce an amount of revenue which approximates, but does not exceed, the amount of revenue produced from the levy for the preceding fiscal year. The county board of supervisors shall not increase the millage rate for the purposes authorized herein unless notice thereof is published and an election held, if required, in the manner set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

Each railroad authority shall be subject to examination by the State Auditor.

The tax levy authorized in this section shall not be included in the ten percent (10%) limitation on increases under Sections 27-39-320 or 27-39-321.

The tax levy authorized in this section shall not be reimbursable under the provisions of the Homestead Exemption Law.

A railroad authority created under Section 19-29-7(2) must receive the approval of the governing authorities of the municipality and the county creating such authority before levying any tax under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 519, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 376, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 19-29-19.
Acquisition of property by eminent domain.

In the acquisition of property by eminent domain proceedings authorized by this chapter, an authority shall proceed in the manner provided by Chapter 27 of Title 11, Mississippi Code of 1972, and as elsewhere provided by law. For the purpose of making surveys and examinations relative to eminent domain proceedings, it shall be lawful for the authority to enter upon the land, doing no damage. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other statute or other law, an authority may take possession of any property to be acquired by eminent domain proceedings at any time after the commencement of such proceedings. The authority shall not be precluded from abandoning such proceedings at any time prior to final order and decree of the court having jurisdiction of such proceedings. The authority shall be liable to the owner of the property for any damage done to the property during possession thereof by the authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 19-29-21.
Disposal of railroad property or facilities.

Except as may be limited by the terms and conditions of any grant, loan or agreement authorized by Section 19-29-17 an authority may, by sale, lease or otherwise, dispose of any of its railroad property and facilities, or other property, or portion thereof or interest therein, acquired pursuant to this chapter. Such disposal by sale, lease or otherwise shall be in accordance with the laws of this state governing the disposition of other public property, except that in the case of disposal to another authority, a municipality or county or an agency of the state or federal government for use and operation as a public railroad, the sale, lease or other disposal may be effected in such manner and upon such terms as the commissioners of the authority may deem in the best interest of the railroad system in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 19-29-23.
Contracts or leases in connection with operation of railroad properties and facilities.

In connection with the operation of railroad properties and facilities owned or controlled by an authority, the authority may enter into contracts, leases and other arrangements with any persons:

Granting the privilege of using or improving the railroad properties and facilities or any portion or facility thereof or space therein for railroad purposes;

Conferring the privilege of supplying goods, commodities, things, services or facilities at railroad properties and facilities; and

Making available services to be furnished by the authority or its agents at the railroad properties and facilities.

In each case the authority may establish the terms and conditions and fix the charges, rentals or fees for the privileges or services, which shall be reasonable and uniform for the same class of privilege or service and which shall be established with due regard to the property and improvements used and the expenses of operation to the authority.

Except as may be limited by the terms and conditions of any grant, loan or agreement authorized by Section 19-29-9, an authority may, by contract, lease or other arrangements, upon a consideration fixed by it, grant to any qualified person for a term to be agreed upon, the privilege of operating, as agent of the authority or otherwise, any railroad owned or controlled by the authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 19-29-25.
Rules and regulations.

An authority is authorized to adopt, amend and repeal such reasonable resolutions, rules, regulations and orders as it shall deem necessary for the management, government and use of any railroad properties and facilities owned by it or under its control. No rule, regulation, order or standard prescribed by the commission shall be inconsistent with, or contrary to, this chapter, or any act of the Congress of the United States or any regulation promulgated or standard established pursuant thereto. The authority shall keep on file at the principal office of the authority for public inspection a copy of all its rules and regulations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 19-29-27.
Designation of agent for receipt and disbursement of funds.

An authority is authorized to designate the Governor’s office of planning and coordination as its agent to accept, receive, receipt for and disburse federal and state moneys, and other moneys, public or private, made available by grant or loan or both, to accomplish in whole or in part, any of the purposes of this chapter. All moneys received by the said agent pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the state treasury, and unless otherwise prescribed by the agency from which such moneys were received, shall be kept in separate funds designated according to the purposes for which the moneys were made available, and held by the state in trust for such purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 19-29-29.
Issuance of bonds by authority; security; limitation of liability thereon; tax exemption.

An authority shall have power to issue bonds from time to time, in its discretion, for any of its corporate purposes. An authority shall also have power to issue refunding bonds for the purpose of paying or retiring bonds previously issued by it. An authority may issue such types of bonds as it may determine, including (without limiting the generality of the foregoing) bonds on which the principal and interest are payable out of income or revenues from certain designated railroad properties and facilities and/or out of any general revenues of the authority, including income or revenues received from the federal government or from other sources. Any such bonds may be additionally secured by a pledge of any grant or contributions from the federal government or other source, or a pledge of any income or revenues of the authority, or a mortgage of any railroad properties and facilities of the authority.

Neither the commissioners of an authority nor any person executing the bonds shall be liable personally on the bonds by reason of the issuance thereof. The bonds and other obligations of an authority (and such bonds and obligations shall so state on their face) shall not be a debt of the city, the county, the state or any political subdivision thereof and neither the city or the county, nor the state or any political subdivision thereof shall be liable thereon, nor in any event shall such bonds or obligations be payable out of any funds or properties other than those of said authority. The bonds shall not constitute an indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory debt limitation or restriction. Bonds of an authority are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose and to be public instrumentalities and, together with interest thereon and income therefrom, shall be exempt from taxes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 19-29-31.
Resolution authorizing issuance of bonds; terms and covenants.

The issuance of bonds by an authority shall be authorized by a resolution of the governing body of such authority. Every such resolution shall be adopted by the affirmative vote of at least three-fifths (3/5) of all the members of such governing body.

A resolution in compliance with this section shall include any covenants with the bondholders deemed necessary by the commissioners to make such bonds secure and marketable, including, but without limitation, covenants regarding the application of the bond proceeds; the pledging, application and securing of the revenues of the authority, including tolls, fees, rents, charges or any other revenues derived from the operation of the railroad and related uses of the property, the creation and maintenance of reserves; the investment of funds; the issuance of additional bonds; the maintenance of minimum fees, charges and rentals; the operation and maintenance of its railroad properties and facilities, insurance and insurance proceeds; accounts and audits; the sale of railroad properties and facilities; remedies of bondholders; the vesting in a trustee or trustees such powers and rights as may be necessary to secure the bonds and the revenues and funds from which they are payable; the terms and conditions upon which bondholders may exercise their rights and remedies; the replacement of lost, destroyed or mutilated bonds; the definition, consequences and remedies of an event of default; the amendment of such resolution; and the appointment of a receiver in the event of a default.

Upon final enactment, each such resolution shall be published in full.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 19-29-33.
Form and details of bonds.

Bonds authorized by resolution of the authority may be issued in one or more series and shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates, provided that the bonds of any issue shall not bear a greater overall maximum interest rate to maturity than that allowed in Section 75-17-103, be in such denomination or denominations, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such conversion or registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of redemption (with or without premium) as such resolution, its trust indenture or mortgage may provide. No bond shall bear more than one (1) rate of interest; each bond shall bear interest from its date to its stated maturity date at the interest rate specified in the bid; all bonds of the same maturity shall bear the same rate of interest from date to maturity; all interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year.

No interest payment shall be evidenced by more than one (1) coupon and neither cancelled nor supplemental coupons shall be permitted; the lowest interest rate specified for any bonds issued shall not be less than seventy percent (70%) of the highest interest rate specified for the same bond issue.

Each interest rate specified in any bid must be in multiples of one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) or in multiples of one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%). The denomination, form and place or places of payment of such bonds shall be fixed in the resolution or ordinance of the governing authorities issuing such bonds. Such bonds shall be executed by the manual or facsimile signature of the chairman and secretary of such authority, with the seal of the authority affixed thereto. At least one (1) signature on each bond shall be a manual signature, as specified in the resolution. The coupons may bear only the facsimile signatures of such chairman and secretary. No bonds shall be issued and sold under the provisions of this chapter for less than par and accrued interest.

The bonds may be sold at not less than par at public sale held after notice published once at least five (5) days prior to such sale in a newspaper having a general circulation in the area of operation and in a financial newspaper published in the City of Jackson, Mississippi, or in the City of New York, New York. Such bonds may be sold at not less than par to the federal government at private sale without any public advertisement.

In case any of the commissioners or officers of the authority whose signatures appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be such commissioners or officers before the delivery of such bonds, such signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such commissioners or officers had remained in office until such delivery. Any provision of any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall be fully negotiable.

The determination of the authority, in the resolution authorizing the bonds, as to the classification of the railroad properties and facilities for which such bonds are authorized and as to the maximum period of usefulness shall be conclusive in any action or proceeding involving the validity of such bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 17; Laws, 1985, ch. 477, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1985).

§ 19-29-35.
Trust agreement securing bonds.

In the discretion of the authority, the bonds may be further secured by a trust agreement by and between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank incorporated under the laws of the United States or the laws of any state in the United States. Any such trust agreement may pledge or assign income, fees or any other revenues and receipts to be received from a lessee or other user of railroad properties and facilities, whether or not they are related thereto. The bonds may be additionally secured by a mortgage, deed of trust or other security interest upon the railroad properties and facilities vesting in the trustee power to sell such project for the payment of indebtedness, power to operate a project and all other powers and authority for the further security of the bonds. The trust agreement may evidence a pledge of all or any part of the revenues to be derived from the project for the payment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the bonds as the same shall become due and payable and may provide for the creation and maintenance of reserves. Any such trust agreement or any resolution providing for the issuance of bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the holders thereof as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of the law, including the duties of the authority and the lessee or other user in relation to the railroad properties and facilities and any construction, improvement, maintenance, repair, operation and insurance of same for which such bonds have been issued, and the custody, safekeeping, guarding and application of all moneys. Any such trust agreement may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee, and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders as is customary in trust agreements or trust indentures securing bonds and debentures of corporations. In addition to the foregoing, any such trust agreement may contain such provisions as the authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders and may also contain provisions governing the issuance of bonds to replace lost, stolen or mutilated bonds. All expenses incurred by the authority in carrying out the provisions of such trust agreement may be treated as a part of the costs of the operation of the railroad properties and facilities with respect to which the bonds have been issued. Any trust agreement made in accordance with the provisions of this chapter may contain a provision that, in the event of a default in the payment of the principal of, redemption premium, if any, or the interest on the bonds issued in accordance with or relating to such agreement, or in the performance of any agreement contained in the proceedings, trust agreement or instruments relating to such bonds, such payment and performance may be enforced by mandamus or by the appointment of a receiver in equity with power to charge and collect rates, rents or contract payments and to apply the revenues from the project in accordance with such proceedings, trust agreement or instrument. Any mortgage or deed of trust to secure bonds issued in accordance with the provisions of this chapter may also provide that in the event of a default in the payment thereof or in the violation of any agreement contained in the mortgage or deed of trust, the property secured by the mortgage or deed of trust may be foreclosed and sold under proceedings in equity or in any other manner now or hereinafter permitted by law. Such mortgage or deed of trust may also provide that any trustee under such mortgage or deed of trust, or the holder of any of the bonds secured thereby, may become the purchaser at any foreclosure sale if it is the highest bidder therefor.

The powers herein granted may be exercised whether or not a trust agreement is entered into and, if no trust agreement is entered into, such provisions as are above authorized may be set out in the resolution authorizing the bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 19-29-37.
Bonds to be legal investments and negotiable instruments.

The bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be legal investments for the state, municipal corporations, political subdivisions, public bodies, commercial banks, savings and loan associations and insurance companies organized under the laws of this state.

All bonds and appurtenant coupons issued pursuant to this chapter shall be negotiable instruments within the meaning of the Uniform Commercial Code of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 19-29-39.
Property and income of authority exempt from taxation.

Any property in this state acquired by an authority for railroad purposes pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, and any income derived by the authority from the ownership, operation or control thereof shall be exempt from taxation to the same extent as other property belonging to political subdivisions of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 19-29-41.
Real property of authority exempt from levy and execution.

All real property of an authority shall be exempt from levy and sale by virtue of an execution, and no execution or other judicial process shall issue against the same nor shall any judgment against an authority be for a charge or lien upon its real property; however, the provisions of this section shall not apply to or limit the right of obligees to foreclose or otherwise enforce any mortgage of an authority or the right of obligees to pursue any remedies for the enforcement of any pledge or lien given by an authority on its rents, fees or revenues.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 544, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1980.